Utah statutes.
10-1-408.   Procedure for taxes erroneously recovered from customers.

A customer may not bring a cause of action against a telecommunications provider on the basis that the telecommunications provider erroneously recovered from the customer municipal telecommunications license taxes authorized by this part unless the customer meets the same requirements that a purchaser is required to meet to bring a cause of action against a seller for a refund or credit as provided in Subsection 59-12-110.1(3).



Amended by Chapter 255, 2004 General Session

